Wisconsin, session 2025, AB169.
do enact as follows:AB169,1Section 1. 108.04 (1) (hg) of the statutes is created to read:108.04 (1) (hg) 1. An employing unit may report to the department whenever any of the following occurs:a. An individual declines a job interview or job offer with the employing unit.b. An individual fails to respond to a job interview offer or job offer made by the employing unit.c. An individual cancels or fails to attend a scheduled job interview with the employing unit, unless the individual promptly attempts to reschedule the job interview.d. An employee claiming benefits is unavailable for, or unable to perform, work actually available within a given week as described in par. (a).e. The employing unit recalls an employee who fails to return to work as described in sub. (8) (c).2. The department shall investigate each report submitted under subd. 1. as needed to determine whether the report affects a claimant’s eligibility under sub. (2) (hL).AB169,2Section 2. 108.04 (2) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:108.04 (2) (a) 3. The claimant conducts a reasonable search for suitable work during that week and provides verification of that search to the department. The claimant’s verification under this subdivision shall include a record of all job offers, job interview offers, recalls to return to work, and any other offers of work received or responded to by the claimant since the prior week’s verification, as further prescribed by the department. The search for suitable work must include at least 4 actions per week that constitute a reasonable search as prescribed by rule of the department. In addition, the department may, by rule, require a claimant to take more than 4 reasonable work search actions in any week. The department shall require a uniform number of reasonable work search actions for similar types of claimants.AB169,3Section 3. 108.04 (2) (ae) of the statutes is renumbered 108.04 (2) (ae) 2.AB169,4Section 4. 108.04 (2) (ae) 1. of the statutes is created to read:108.04 (2) (ae) 1. In determining whether a claimant is available for work under par. (a) 1. and has maintained an attachment to the labor market, the department shall consider reports made by employing units under sub. (1) (hg).AB169,5Section 5. 108.04 (2) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:108.04 (2) (bm) A claimant is ineligible to receive benefits for any week for which there is a determination that the claimant failed to comply with the registration for work and work search requirements under par. (a) 2. or 3. or failed to provide verification to the department that the claimant complied with those requirements, unless the department has waived those requirements under par. (b), (bb), or (bd) or s. 108.062 (10m). If the department has paid benefits to a claimant for any such week, the department may shall act to recover the overpayment under s. 108.22.AB169,6Section 6. 108.04 (2) (g) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:108.04 (2) (g) 2. If a claimant’s security credentials are used in the filing of an initial or continued claim for benefits or any other transaction, the individual using the security credentials is presumed to have been the claimant or the claimant’s authorized agent. This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of evidence showing that the claimant who created the security credentials or the claimant’s authorized agent was not the person who used the credentials in a given transaction. If a claimant uses an agent to engage in any transaction with the department using the claimant’s security credentials, the claimant is responsible for the actions of the agent. If a claimant who created security credentials or the claimant’s authorized agent divulges the credentials to another person, or fails to take adequate measures to protect the credentials from being divulged to an unauthorized person, and the department pays benefits to an unauthorized person because of the claimant’s action or inaction, the department may recover from the claimant the benefits that were paid to the unauthorized person shall, in the same manner as provided for overpayments to claimants under s. 108.22 or under s. 108.245, act to recover from the claimant the benefits that were paid to the unauthorized person. If a claimant who created security credentials or the claimant’s authorized agent divulges the credentials to another person, or fails to take adequate measures to protect the credentials from being divulged to an unauthorized person, the department is not obligated to pursue recovery of, or to reimburse the claimant for, benefits payable to the claimant that were erroneously paid to another person.AB169,7Section 7. 108.04 (2) (hL) of the statutes is created to read:108.04 (2) (hL) 1. Subject to subd. 2., if a claimant is subject to the requirement under par. (a) 3. to conduct a reasonable search for suitable work for a given week and the department determines, based upon the claimant’s verification under par. (a) 3. or based upon one or more credible reports received by the department, that the claimant did any of the following, the claimant shall not be considered to have conducted a reasonable search for suitable work in that week under par. (a) 3.:a. Declined a job interview offer.b. Failed to respond to a job interview offer. For purposes of this subd. 1. b., a claimant shall have 3 working days after receipt of a job interview offer to respond to the offer, after which the offer shall be considered to have been declined.c. Canceled or failed to attend a scheduled job interview.2. A claimant may demonstrate to the department that a report described in subd. 1. was inaccurate, that an interview was for a job that the claimant was not required to accept under sub. (8) (d) to (em), that the claimant promptly attempted to reschedule a canceled or missed interview under subd. 1. c., or that the claimant had other good cause for the declination or failure reported. If the department so determines, the report shall be disregarded for purposes of subd. 1.AB169,8Section 8. 108.04 (11) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:108.04 (11) (cm) If any person makes a false statement or representation in order to obtain benefits in the name of another person, the benefits received by that person constitute a benefit overpayment. Such person may shall, by a determination or decision issued under s. 108.095, be required to repay the amount of the benefits obtained and be assessed an administrative assessment in an additional amount equal to the amount of benefits obtained.AB169,9Section 9. 108.14 (19) of the statutes is renumbered 108.14 (19) (intro.) and amended to read:108.14 (19) (intro.) No later than March 15 annually, the department shall prepare and furnish to the council on unemployment insurance and to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature, for distribution to the appropriate standing committees under s. 13.172 (3), a report summarizing the department’s activities related to detection and prosecution of unemployment insurance fraud in the preceding year. The department shall include all of the following in the report information:(a) Information about audits conducted by the department under sub. (20), including the number and results of audits performed, in the previous year.AB169,10Section 10. 108.14 (19) (b) of the statutes is created to read:108.14 (19) (b) Information on reports submitted by employing units under s. 108.04 (1) (hg) 1., including actions taken by the department in response to the reports as required under s. 108.04 (1) (hg) 2. and their effect on claimants’ eligibility for benefits under s. 108.04 (2) (ae) 1. and (hL).AB169,11Section 11. 108.14 (21) of the statutes is amended to read:108.14 (21) The department shall maintain a portal on the Internet that allows employers employing units to log in and file with the department complaints related to the administration of this chapter and reports under s. 108.04 (1) (hg).AB169,12Section 12. 108.14 (28) of the statutes is created to read:108.14 (28) The department shall have in effect methods to address circumstances in which an employee fails to return to work or to accept suitable work without good cause as described in s. 108.04 (8) or in which the employee is unavailable for work or unable to perform work under s. 108.04 (1) (a). The methods shall include all of the following:(a) Reporting methods, including a telephone line, an email address, and an online portal, for an employing unit to notify the department when an employee refuses an offer of work.(b) A plain-language notice provided to employees by the department when applying for benefits about the application of s. 108.04 (8) (a) to (c), including what constitutes suitable work under s. 108.04 (8) (d) and (dm), and an employee’s right to fail to accept suitable work for good cause under s. 108.04 (8) (em); about the application of s. 108.04 (1) (a); and including information on contesting the denial of a claim that has been denied due to a report by an employing unit that an employee failed to return to work, failed to accept suitable work, or was unavailable for work or unable to perform work.AB169,13Section 13. 108.22 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:108.22 (8) (a) If benefits are erroneously paid to an individual, the individual’s liability to reimburse the fund for the overpayment may shall be set forth in a determination or decision issued under s. 108.09. Any determination which that establishes or increases an overpayment shall include a finding concerning whether waiver of benefit recovery is required under par. (c). If any decision of an appeal tribunal, the commission or any court establishes or increases an overpayment and the decision does not include a finding concerning whether waiver of benefit recovery is required under par. (c), the tribunal, commission or court shall remand the issue to the department for a determination.AB169,14Section 14. Initial applicability.(1) The renumbering of s. 108.04 (2) (ae), the amendment of s. 108.04 (2) (a) 3., and the creation of s. 108.04 (2) (ae) 1. and (hL) first apply to weeks of unemployment beginning on the effective date of this subsection.AB169,15Section 15. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the Sunday after publication, except as follows:(1) The treatment of s. 108.14 (28) takes effect on the first Sunday after the 180th day after publication. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab169 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab169 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB169 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB169 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB169: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting